Utah statutes.
20A-11-903.   Rate of charge.

Any person or persons accepting expenditures from a candidate or a personal campaign committee shall provide services and furnish goods, materials, or things of value at a rate that does not exceed the charges made for comparable use to any other person considering amount of use, frequency of use, and applicable discounts.

